dev/adverb/adverb.ne.dix
  <!-- च्यातच्युत; च्यातच्युत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="च्यातच्युत__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बावजूद; बावजूद; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बावजूद__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हुरुक्क; हुरुक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हुरुक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तदन्तर; तदन्तर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तदन्तर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अहिले; अहिले; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अहिले__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अहिले; अहिले; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अहिले__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- टुप्लुक्कै; टुप्लुक्कै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="टुप्लुक्कै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्याहा; त्याहा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्याहा__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ज्यादामात्रा; ज्यादामात्रा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ज्यादामात्रा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फुस्लुङ; फुस्लुङ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फुस्लुङ__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम्मानार्थ; सम्मानार्थ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सम्मानार्थ__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कदापी; कदापी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कदापी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ट्वाल्ल; ट्वाल्ल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ट्वाल्ल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जगजग; जगजग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जगजग__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निःसन्देह; निःसन्देह; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निःसन्देह__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्थापानार्थ; स्थापानार्थ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्थापानार्थ__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यसबखत; यसबखत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यसबखत__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लेशमात्र; लेशमात्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लेशमात्र__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लुसुलुसु; लुसुलुसु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लुसुलुसु__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संयमपूर्वक; संयमपूर्वक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संयमपूर्वक__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आर्तनादसङ्ग; आर्तनादसङ्ग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आर्तनादसङ्ग__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वरपर; वरपर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वरपर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जवर्जस्ती; जवर्जस्ती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जवर्जस्ती__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ठिङ्ग; ठिङ्ग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ठिङ्ग__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यीमध्ये; यीमध्ये; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यीमध्ये__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कानूनतः; कानूनतः; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कानूनतः__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विशेषत; विशेषत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विशेषत__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- महिनाभन्दा; महिनाभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="महिनाभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चिट्ट; चिट्ट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चिट्ट__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुइय; सुइय; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सुइय__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छिटोभन्दा; छिटोभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छिटोभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गजक्क; गजक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गजक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम्भवतः; सम्भवतः; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सम्भवतः__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अलिअलि; अलिअलि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अलिअलि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फलफूलभन्दा; फलफूलभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फलफूलभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एकाएक; एकाएक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एकाएक__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पहिल्यै; पहिल्यै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पहिल्यै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पहिल्यै; पहिल्यै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पहिल्यै__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नहुञ्जेल; नहुञ्जेल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नहुञ्जेल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तोकिएभन्दा; तोकिएभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तोकिएभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झण्डै; झण्डै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झण्डै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फलतः; फलतः; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फलतः__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तत्त्वतः; तत्त्वतः; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तत्त्वतः__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भारतभन्दा; भारतभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भारतभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="च्यातच्युत"><i>च्यातच्युत</i><par n="च्यातच्युत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बावजूद"><i>बावजूद</i><par n="बावजूद__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="हुरुक्क"><i>हुरुक्क</i><par n="हुरुक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तदन्तर"><i>तदन्तर</i><par n="तदन्तर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अहिले"><i>अहिले</i><par n="अहिले__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अहिले"><i>अहिले</i><par n="अहिले__"/></e>
    <e lm="टुप्लुक्कै"><i>टुप्लुक्कै</i><par n="टुप्लुक्कै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="त्याहा"><i>त्याहा</i><par n="त्याहा__"/></e>
    <e lm="ज्यादामात्रा"><i>ज्यादामात्रा</i><par n="ज्यादामात्रा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="फुस्लुङ"><i>फुस्लुङ</i><par n="फुस्लुङ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्मानार्थ"><i>सम्मानार्थ</i><par n="सम्मानार्थ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कदापी"><i>कदापी</i><par n="कदापी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ट्वाल्ल"><i>ट्वाल्ल</i><par n="ट्वाल्ल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जगजग"><i>जगजग</i><par n="जगजग__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="निःसन्देह"><i>निःसन्देह</i><par n="निःसन्देह__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="स्थापानार्थ"><i>स्थापानार्थ</i><par n="स्थापानार्थ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यसबखत"><i>यसबखत</i><par n="यसबखत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="लेशमात्र"><i>लेशमात्र</i><par n="लेशमात्र__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="लुसुलुसु"><i>लुसुलुसु</i><par n="लुसुलुसु__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="संयमपूर्वक"><i>संयमपूर्वक</i><par n="संयमपूर्वक__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आर्तनादसङ्ग"><i>आर्तनादसङ्ग</i><par n="आर्तनादसङ्ग__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="वरपर"><i>वरपर</i><par n="वरपर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जवर्जस्ती"><i>जवर्जस्ती</i><par n="जवर्जस्ती__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ठिङ्ग"><i>ठिङ्ग</i><par n="ठिङ्ग__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यीमध्ये"><i>यीमध्ये</i><par n="यीमध्ये__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कानूनतः"><i>कानूनतः</i><par n="कानूनतः__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="विशेषत"><i>विशेषत</i><par n="विशेषत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="महिनाभन्दा"><i>महिनाभन्दा</i><par n="महिनाभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="चिट्ट"><i>चिट्ट</i><par n="चिट्ट__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सुइय"><i>सुइय</i><par n="सुइय__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="छिटोभन्दा"><i>छिटोभन्दा</i><par n="छिटोभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="गजक्क"><i>गजक्क</i><par n="गजक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्भवतः"><i>सम्भवतः</i><par n="सम्भवतः__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अलिअलि"><i>अलिअलि</i><par n="अलिअलि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="फलफूलभन्दा"><i>फलफूलभन्दा</i><par n="फलफूलभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="एकाएक"><i>एकाएक</i><par n="एकाएक__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पहिल्यै"><i>पहिल्यै</i><par n="पहिल्यै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पहिल्यै"><i>पहिल्यै</i><par n="पहिल्यै__"/></e>
    <e lm="नहुञ्जेल"><i>नहुञ्जेल</i><par n="नहुञ्जेल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तोकिएभन्दा"><i>तोकिएभन्दा</i><par n="तोकिएभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="झण्डै"><i>झण्डै</i><par n="झण्डै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="फलतः"><i>फलतः</i><par n="फलतः__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तत्त्वतः"><i>तत्त्वतः</i><par n="तत्त्वतः__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="भारतभन्दा"><i>भारतभन्दा</i><par n="भारतभन्दा__adv"/></e>
